Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 496.283 is amended to read:
496.283. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 506.306, all moneys received by the State Fish  and Wildlife
Commission pursuant to sections 4, 6 and 8, chapter 512,  Oregon Laws 1989, shall be deposited in
a separate subaccount  in the State Wildlife Fund. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this sec-
tion, moneys in the subaccount may be expended only for [ the department’s ] State Department  of
Fish and Wildlife  fish restoration and enhancement programs for the benefit of the  fish resources
of this state.
(2) Fees collected from salmon ranching permits authorized under ORS  508.700 to 508.745 [ will]
may not be commingled with public fishery funds collected  and deposited in the subaccount referred
to in this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, [ these funds will  be used ] the de-
partment shall use moneys from salmon ranching permits  authorized under ORS 508.700 to
508.745 to monitor the effect and impact of private salmon ranching on  the fishery resources of
Oregon.
(3) The department :
(a) [ shall] May  not divert [ present] budgeted  funds to other projects as funds pursuant to
sections 4, 6 and 8, chapter 512, Oregon Laws 1989, become available .
(b) [ and shall not embark on new programs not ] May use the subaccount moneys only for
programs vital to the restoration of Oregon fisheries as required by Oregon Revised Statutes and
administrative rules. [ The department shall ]
(c) May  not assess [ its] department  personnel costs in the administration of  [ chapter 512,
Oregon Laws 1989, ] activities benefiting fish restoration and  enhancement programs  against
the subaccount referred  to in this section without the prior approval of the Restoration and En-
hancement Board.
SECTION 2.  ORS 496.286 is amended to read:
496.286. (1) There is established within the State Department of Fish and Wildlife the  Restora-
tion and Enhancement Board, consisting of seven members  appointed by the State Fish and Wildlife
Commission.
Enrolled Senate Bill 42 (SB 42-B) Page 1
(2) Three  members shall be appointed to represent the ocean and inland recreational fisheries.
In making appointments pursuant to  this subsection, the commission shall consider recommendations
from the State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(3) Three members of  the board shall be appointed to represent the commercial [ troll and gillnet
fisheries and the fish processing ] salmon  industry. In making appointments pursuant to this  sub-
section, the commission shall consider recommendations from the State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(4) One member of the board shall be appointed to represent the public.
(5) A member of the  board shall receive no compensation for services as a member. However,
subject to any applicable law regulating travel and other expenses of  state officers and employees,
a member shall be reimbursed  for actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in the
performance of official duties from such moneys made available by sections 4, 6 and 8, chapter  512,
Oregon Laws 1989.
(6) The term of office of a member of the board is four  years. A member of the board is eligible
for reappointment.
(7) An official action of the board may be taken only upon the affirmative vote of four members.
(8) The board shall select such officers for such terms and with  such duties and powers as the
board considers necessary for the performance of those offices.
(9) Subject to ORS 496.289 (2),  the board  shall meet at such times and at such places as may
be determined by the chair or by the majority of the members of the board.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 496.289 is amended to read:
496.289. [(1) The Restoration and Enhancement Board shall meet, adopt  and recommend to the
State Fish and Wildlife Commission, within 120 days after  July 1, 1989, and at not more than 120-day
intervals thereafter, fish restoration and enhancement programs. ]
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Enhancement” includes, but is not limited to, the following activities:
(A) Angler access.
(B) New fishways and screens.
(C) Habitat.
(D) New hatchery equipment and technology.
(E) Public education.
(F) Aquatic inventories.
(b) “Restoration” includes, but is not limited to, the following activities:
(A) Modification of existing fishways and existing screens.
(B) Hatchery restoration.
(C) Liberation equipment.
(2) The Restoration and Enhancement  Board shall meet at least four times each
biennium.
(3) The  board shall adopt recommendations regarding fish restoration and enhancement
programs and present the recommendations to the State Fish and Wildlife Commission.
[(2)] (4) The commission shall  review [ such] fish restoration and enhancement  programs and
may approve or disapprove [ any or all ] program recommendations made by the board.  Funds may
be expended from the subaccount referred to in ORS 496.283 for projects that have  been approved
by the commission.
[(3)] (5)  The State Department of Fish and Wildlife and  the board jointly shall submit to each
odd-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly a report on  expenditure of funds for
the fish restoration and enhancement program and on the status of various projects.
[(4)] (6) In recommending fish restoration and enhancement programs, the board shall:
(a) Recommend  a mix of projects that provide a balance between restoration and enhancement
benefits.
(b) Recommend projects that are to be implemented by the salmon  and trout enhancement pro-
gram and nonprofit organizations engaged in approved restoration and enhancement activities.
(c) Encourage projects that result in obtaining matching funds from other sources.
Enrolled Senate Bill 42 (SB 42-B) Page 2
[(5)] (7) All moneys made available for  the fish restoration and enhancement program from funds
received under sections 4, 6 and 8, chapter 512, Oregon Laws 1989, and from gifts and grants made
to carry out the fish restoration and enhancement program may be expended only  if recommended
by the board and approved by the commission. Such amounts may be expended:
(a) On programs benefiting the  commercial fishing industry in the same proportion as revenues
received from surcharges under sections 6 and 8, chapter 512, Oregon  Laws 1989, bear to the total
amount of surcharge revenues.
(b) On programs benefiting recreational  angling in the same proportion as revenues received
from the dedication under section 4, chapter 512, Oregon Laws 1989,  bear to the total amount of
dedicated revenues.
[(6)] (8)  The board  may accept, from whatever source, gifts or grants for the purposes of fish
restoration and enhancement. All moneys so accepted shall be deposited in the subaccount  referred
to in ORS 496.283. Unless otherwise required by the terms of  a gift or grant, gifts or grants shall
be expended as provided in subsection [ (5)] (7) of this section.
[(7) As used in this section: ]
[(a) “Enhancement” includes, but is not limited to, the following activities: ]
[(A) Angler access. ]
[(B) New fishways and screens. ]
[(C) Habitat.]
[(D) New hatchery equipment and technology. ]
[(E) Public education. ]
[(F) Aquatic inventories. ]
[(b) “Restoration” includes, but is not limited to, the following activities: ]
[(A) Modification of existing fishways and existing screens. ]
[(B) Hatchery restoration. ]
[(C) Liberation equipment. ]
SECTION 4.
 Section 4, chapter 512, Oregon Laws 1989, as amended by  section 1, chapter 184,
Oregon Laws 1991, section 3, chapter  619, Oregon Laws 1993, section 9, chapter 8, Oregon Laws
1997, section 11, chapter 1006, Oregon Laws 1999, section 1, chapter 643, Oregon Laws  2003, section
1, chapter  765, Oregon Laws 2009, and section 16, chapter 779, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to
read:
Sec. 4. Notwithstanding any other provision  of the wildlife laws [ and during the period begin-
ning January 1, 1998, and ending December 31, 2019 ], of the moneys received from  the sale of the
following licenses, the following amounts shall be deposited as provided for in ORS 496.283:
(1) Resident annual combination license issued under ORS 497.132, $4.
(2) Resident annual angling license issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(a), $4.
(3) Angling license to angle for one day issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(d), $2.
(4) Angling and shellfish license to angle and take shellfish  for one day issued under ORS
497.121 (1)(e), $2.
(5) Angling license to angle for two days issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(f), $2.
(6) Angling license to angle for three days issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(g), $2.
(7) Nonresident annual angling license issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(b), $10.
(8) Nonresident angling license to angle for seven consecutive days issued under ORS 497.121
(1)(c), $5.
SECTION 5.
 Section 6, chapter  512, Oregon Laws 1989, as amended by section 2, chapter 184,
Oregon Laws 1991, section 10, chapter 8, Oregon Laws 1997,  section 2, chapter 643, Oregon Laws
2003, and section 3, chapter 765, Oregon Laws 2009, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  In addition to the  fees otherwise prescribed by law, the issuer of each of the following
permits shall charge and collect  the following surcharges  each time the permit  is issued[ , during
the period beginning January 1, 1998, and ending December 31, 2019, the following surcharges ]:
(1) Ocean Troll Salmon Fishery permit issued under ORS 508.816, $65.
(2) Columbia River Gillnet Fishery permit issued under ORS 508.790, $74.
Enrolled Senate Bill 42 (SB 42-B) Page 3
SECTION 6.  Section 8, chapter  512, Oregon Laws 1989, as amended by section 3, chapter 184,
Oregon Laws 1991, section 11, chapter 8, Oregon Laws 1997,  section 3, chapter 643, Oregon Laws
2003, section 4, chapter  765, Oregon Laws 2009, and section 5, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, is
amended to read:
Sec. 8. In addition to the ad valorem fee prescribed by law, [ during the period beginning January
1, 1998, and  ending December 31, 2019, ] there shall be paid for each fish species referred to in ORS
508.505 (1)(a), an additional fee of four cents per pound. The ad valorem fee  referred to in this
section is subject to ORS 508.505 to 508.540.
SECTION 7. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate June 3, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 10, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 42 (SB 42-B) Page 4